Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 9. Multistate Highway Transportation Agreement

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d States, Territories and Dependencies §§ 10, 12, 15 to 17.

81A C.J.S. States § 31.

§ 31-18-901.
Agreement provisions generally.

The Multistate Highway Transportation Agreement is enacted into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein in form substantially as follows:

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-15-101

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1993, ch. 68, § 3; ch. 98, § 1; 1996, ch. 66, § 1; 2001, ch. 135, § 1.

ARTICLE I DEFINITIONS

SECTION 1

As used in this agreement:

“Cooperating committee” means a body composed of the designated representatives from the participating jurisdictions;

“Designated representative” means a legislator or other person authorized under article IX to represent the jurisdiction;

“Jurisdiction” means a state of the United States or the District of Columbia;

“Vehicle” means any vehicle as defined by statute to be subject to size and weight standards which operates in two (2) or more participating jurisdictions.

ARTICLE II GENERAL PROVISIONS

SECTION 1

Qualifications for Membership. Participation in this agreement is open to jurisdictions which subscribe to the findings, purposes and objectives of this agreement and will seek legislation necessary to accomplish these objectives.

SECTION 2

Cooperation. The participating jurisdictions, working through their designated representatives, shall cooperate and assist each other in achieving the desired goals of this agreement pursuant to appropriate statutory authority.

SECTION 3

Vehicle Laws and Regulations. This agreement shall not authorize the operation of a vehicle in any participating jurisdiction contrary to the laws or regulations of that state.

SECTION 4

Interpretation. The final decision regarding interpretation of questions at issue relating to this agreement shall be reached by unanimous joint action of the participating jurisdictions, acting through the designated representatives. Results of all such actions shall be placed in writing. This section shall have no effect on any judicial decision.

SECTION 5

Restrictions, Conditions or Limitations. Any jurisdiction entering this agreement shall provide each other participating jurisdiction with a list of any restriction, condition or limitation on the general terms of this agreement, if any.

SECTION 6

Additional Jurisdictions. Additional jurisdictions may become members of this agreement by signing and accepting the terms of the agreement.

ARTICLE III COOPERATING COMMITTEE

SECTION 1

Each participating jurisdiction shall have two (2) designated representatives. Pursuant to section 2, article II, the designated representatives of each of the participating jurisdictions shall constitute the cooperating committee which shall have the power to:

Collect, correlate, analyze and evaluate information resulting or derivable from research and testing activities in relation to vehicle size and weight related matters;

Recommend and encourage the undertaking of research and testing in any aspect of vehicle size and weight or related matter when, in their collective judgment, appropriate or sufficient research or testing has not been undertaken;

Recommend changes in law or policy with emphasis on compatibility of laws and uniformity of administrative rules or regulations which would promote effective governmental action or coordination in the field of vehicle size and weight related matters.

Consider mutual transportation problems of the motor carrier industry and recommend changes.

Recommend improvements in highway operations, in vehicular safety and in state administration of highway transportation laws.

Perform functions necessary to facilitate the purposes of this agreement.

SECTION 2

Each designated representative of a participating jurisdiction shall be entitled to one (1) vote only. No action of the committee is approved unless a majority of the total number of votes cast by the designated representatives of the participating jurisdictions are in favor thereof.

SECTION 3

The committee shall meet at least once annually and shall elect, from among its members, a chairman, a vice-chairman and a secretary.

SECTION 4

The committee shall submit annually to the legislature of each participating jurisdiction a report setting forth the work of the committee during the preceding year and including recommendations developed by the committee. The committee may submit such additional reports as it deems appropriate or desirable.

ARTICLE IV OBJECTIVES OF THE PARTICIPATING JURISDICTIONS

SECTION 1

Objectives. The participating jurisdictions hereby declare that:

It is the objective of the participating jurisdictions to obtain more efficient and more economical transportation by motor vehicles between and among the participating jurisdictions by encouraging the adoption of standards that will, as minimums, allow the operation on all state highways, except those determined through engineering evaluation to be inadequate, with a single-axle weight of 20,000 pounds, a tandem-axle weight of 36,000 pounds and a gross vehicle or combination weight of that resulting from application of the formula:

W = 500 [LN/(N
-
1)
+
12N
+
36] where W = maximum weight in pounds carried on any group of two (2) or more consecutive axles computed to the nearest five hundred (500) pounds;

L = distance in feet between the extremes of any group of two (2) or more consecutive axles;

N = number of axles in group under consideration.

It is the further objective of the participating jurisdictions that in the event the operation of a vehicle or combination of vehicles in interstate commerce according to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section be authorized under special permit authority by each participating jurisdiction for vehicle combinations in excess of eighty thousand (80,000) pounds gross vehicle weight or statutory maximum lengths. The maximum statutory limits in each participating jurisdiction will not be affected.

It is the further objective of the participating jurisdictions to facilitate and expedite the operation of any vehicle or combination of vehicles between and among the participating jurisdictions under the provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this section, and to that end the participating jurisdictions hereby agree, through their designated representatives, to meet and cooperate in the consideration of vehicle size and weight related matters including, but not limited to, the development of uniform enforcement procedures; additional vehicle size and weight standards; operational standards; agreements or compacts to facilitate regional application and administration of vehicle size and weight standards; uniform permit procedures; uniform application forms; rules and regulations for the operation of vehicles, including equipment requirements, driver qualifications and operating practices; and such other matters as may be pertinent.

The cooperating committee may recommend that the participating jurisdictions jointly secure congressional approval of this agreement and specifically of the vehicle size and weight standards set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

It is the further objective of the participating jurisdictions to:

Establish transportation laws and regulations to meet regional and economic needs and to promote an efficient, safe and compatible transportation network;

Develop standards that facilitate the most efficient and environmentally sound operation of vehicles on highways, consistent with and in recognition of principles of highway safety;

Establish programs to increase productivity and reduce congestion, fuel consumption and related transportation costs and enhance air quality through the uniform application of state vehicle regulations and laws; and

Facilitate communication among legislators, state transportation administrators and commercial industry representatives to discuss unique highway transportation issues in participating jurisdictions.

ARTICLE V ENTRY INTO FORCE AND WITHDRAWAL

SECTION 1

This agreement shall enter into force when enacted into law by any two (2) or more jurisdictions. Thereafter, this agreement shall become effective as to any other jurisdiction upon its enactment thereof, except as otherwise provided in section 6, article II.

SECTION 2

Any participating jurisdiction may withdraw from this agreement by canceling the same but no such withdrawal shall take effect until thirty (30) days after the designated representative of the withdrawing jurisdiction has given notice in writing of the withdrawal to all other participating jurisdictions.

ARTICLE VI CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

SECTION 1

This agreement shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof.

SECTION 2

The provisions of this agreement shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this agreement is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any participating jurisdiction or the applicability thereto to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this agreement shall not be affected thereby. If this agreement shall be held contrary to the constitution of any jurisdiction participating herein, the agreement shall remain in full force and effect as to the jurisdictions affected as to all severable matters.

ARTICLE VII FILING OF DOCUMENTS

SECTION 1

A copy of this agreement, its amendments and rules or regulations promulgated thereunder and interpretations thereof shall be filed in the highway department in each participating jurisdiction and shall be made available for review by interested parties.

ARTICLE VIII EXISTING STATUTES NOT REPEALED

SECTION 1

All existing statutes prescribing weight and size standards and all existing statutes relating to special permits shall continue to be of force and effect until amended or repealed by law.

ARTICLE IX SELECTION OF DESIGNATED REPRESENTATIVES

SECTION 1

The process for selecting the designated representatives to the cooperating committee shall be established by law under this article.

SECTION 2

The persons authorized to represent the state of Wyoming as the designated representatives to the committee shall be the chairman of the senate transportation and highways committee and the chairman of the house transportation and highways committee, or a legislator or a state agency official each chairman may designate.

SECTION 3

The chairmen of the senate and house transportation and highways committees shall also designate one (1) alternate representative who shall also be a legislator or state agency official to serve in the absence of the representative designated under section 2 of this article.

Cross references. —

For the filing of the report required under article III of this section, see §

31-18-903

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no Section 2 in Article I, IV, VII or VIII of this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-18-902.
State cooperation with and assistance to interstate cooperating committee.

The department of transportation shall cooperate with the cooperating committee in carrying out the purpose of W.S.

31-18-901

and shall cooperate with and assist the committee, to the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, with the provisions of article III, section 1(a) and (b).

Funds for the administration of this agreement, including participation in the cooperating committee and the actual expenses of the designated representative, shall be budgeted from the fees collected under W.S.

31-18-502

.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-17-102; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 31-15-102; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 68, § 3; ch. 98, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2011, ch. 176, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

in (b), substituted “31-18-502” for “39-17-206(j).”

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

§ 31-18-903.
Filing of report.

The report required by article III, section 4 of W.S.

31-18-901

shall be filed with the governor and the joint transportation and highways interim committee.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 31, § 1.